Washington statutes.
RCW 31.04.257

Mortgage loan originator interim license.

To prevent undue delay in the issuance of a mortgage loan originator license and to facilitate the business of a mortgage loan originator, an interim license with a fixed date of expiration may be issued when the director determines that the mortgage loan originator has substantially fulfilled the requirements for mortgage loan originator licensing. The director may adopt rules describing the information required before an interim license can be granted.

[ 2009 c 120 s 21.]

NOTES:

Findings—Declaration—2009 c 120: See note following RCW 31.04.015.